Utah statutes.
75-2a-125.   Severability.

If any one or more provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this chapter, or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstance, is found to be unconstitutional, the same is hereby declared to be severable and the balance of this chapter shall remain effective notwithstanding such unconstitutionality.  The Legislature hereby declares that it would have passed this chapter, and each provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this chapter, irrespective of the fact that any one or more provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word be declared unconstitutional.

